Utah statutes.
53-3-211.   Application of minors -- Liability of person signing application -- Cancellation of cosigning adult's liability -- Behind-the-wheel driving certification.

(1)  As used in this section, "minor" means any person younger than 18 years of age who is not married or has not been emancipated by adjudication.

(2) (a)  The application of a minor for a learner permit or provisional license shall be signed by the parent or guardian of the applicant.

(b)  If the minor applicant does not have a parent or guardian or is in the legal custody of the Division of Child and Family Services, then a parent or responsible adult who is willing to assume the obligation imposed under this chapter may sign the application.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the liability of a minor for civil compensatory damages caused when operating a motor vehicle upon a highway is imputed to the person who has signed the application of the minor under Subsection (2).

(b)  The person who has signed the application under Subsection (2) is jointly and severally liable with the minor as provided in Subsections (3)(a) and (c).

(c)  The liability imposed under Subsections (3)(a) and (b) is limited to the policy minimum limits established in Section 31A-22-304.

(d)  The liability provisions in this Subsection (3) are in addition to the liability provisions in Section 53-3-212.

(4) (a)  If owner's or operator's security covering the minor's operation of the motor vehicle is in effect in amounts as required under Section 31A-22-304, the person who signed the minor's application under Subsection (2) is not subject to the liability imposed under Subsection (3).

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirement under Subsection (3), if a foster parent signs an application under Subsection (2) for a minor who is in the legal custody of the Division of Child and Family Services and who resides with the foster parent, the foster parent's liability may not exceed the greater of:

(i)  minimum liability insurance policy limits established under Section 31A-22-304; or

(ii)  the policy limits of the foster parent's liability insurance policy issued in accordance with Section 31A-22-302 that were in effect at the time damages were caused by the minor's operation of a motor vehicle.

(5) (a)  A person who has signed the application of a minor under Subsection (2) may file with the division a verified written request that the permit or license of the minor be canceled.

(b)  The division shall then cancel the permit or license of the minor, and the person who signed the application of the minor under Subsection (2) is relieved from the liability imposed under Subsection (3) or the minor operating a motor vehicle subsequent to the cancellation.

(6) (a)  The division upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the person who signed the application of a minor under Subsection (2) shall cancel the permit or license and may not issue a new permit or license until a new application, signed and verified, is made under this chapter.

(b)  This Subsection (6) does not apply to an application of a person who is no longer a minor.

(7) (a)  In addition to the liability assumed under this section, the person who signs the application of a minor for a provisional license must certify that the minor applicant, under the authority of a permit issued under this chapter, has completed at least 40 hours of driving a motor vehicle, of which at least 10 hours shall be during night hours after sunset.

(b)  The hours of driving a motor vehicle required under Subsection (7)(a) may include:

(i)  hours completed in a driver education course as required under Subsection 53-3-505.5(1); and

(ii)  up to five hours completed by driving simulation practice on a fully interactive driving simulation device at the substitution rate provided under Subsection 53-3-505.5(2)(b).



Amended by Chapter 314, 2008 General Session

